Missouri, session 2026, SB1201.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 115.637, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 115.637,
to read as follows:
115.637. The following offenses, and any others
specifically so described by law, shall be class four
election offenses and are deemed misdemeanors not connected
with the exercise of the right of suffrage. Conviction for
any of these offenses shall be punished by imprisonment of
not more than one year or by a fine of not more than two
thousand five hundred dollars or by both such imprisonment
and fine:
(1) Stealing or willfully concealing, defacing,
mutilating, or destroying any sample ballots that may be
furnished by an organization or individual at or near any
voting place on election day, except that this subdivision
shall not be construed so as to interfere with the right of
an individual voter to erase or cause to be erased on a
sample ballot the name of any candidate and substituting the
name of the person for whom he or she intends to vote; or to
dispose of the received sample ballot;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1201 2
(2) Printing, circulating, or causing to be printed or
circulated, any false and fraudulent sample ballots which
appear on their face to be designed as a fraud upon voters;
(3) Purposefully giving a printed or written sample
ballot to any qualified voter which is intended to mislead
the voter;
(4) On the part of any candidate for election to any
office of honor, trust, or profit, offering or promising to
discharge the duties of such office for a less sum than the
salary, fees, or emoluments as fixed by law or promising to
pay back or donate to any public or private interest any
portion of such salary, fees, or emolument as an inducement
to voters;
(5) On the part of any canvasser appointed to canvass
any registration list, willfully failing to appear, refusing
to continue, or abandoning such canvass or willfully
neglecting to perform his duties in making such canvass or
willfully neglecting any duties lawfully assigned to him or
her;
(6) On the part of any employer, making, enforcing, or
attempting to enforce any order, rule, or regulation or
adopting any other device or method to prevent an employee
from engaging in political activities, accepting candidacy
for nomination to, election to, or the holding of, political
office, holding a position as a member of a political
committee, soliciting or receiving funds for political
purpose, acting as chairman or participating in a political
convention, assuming the conduct of any political campaign,
signing, or subscribing his or her name to any initiative,
referendum, or recall petition, or any other petition
circulated pursuant to law;

SB 1201 3
(7) On the part of any person authorized or employed
to print official ballots, or any person employed in
printing ballots, giving, delivering, or knowingly
permitting to be taken any ballot to or by any person other
than the official under whose direction the ballots are
being printed, any ballot in any form other than that
prescribed by law, or with unauthorized names, with names
misspelled, or with the names of candidates arranged in any
way other than that authorized by law;
(8) On the part of any election authority or official
charged by law with the duty of distributing the printed
ballots, or any person acting on his or her behalf,
knowingly distributing or causing to be distributed any
ballot in any manner other than that prescribed by law;
(9) Any person having in his or her possession any
official ballot, except in the performance of his or her
duty as an election authority or official, or in the act of
exercising his or her individual voting privilege;
(10) Willfully mutilating, defacing, or altering any
ballot before it is delivered to a voter;
(11) On the part of any election judge, being
willfully absent from the polls on election day without good
cause or willfully detaining any election material or
equipment and not causing it to be produced at the voting
place at the opening of the polls or within fifteen minutes
thereafter;
(12) On the part of any election authority or
official, willfully neglecting, refusing, or omitting to
perform any duty required of him or her by law with respect
to holding and conducting an election, receiving and
counting out the ballots, or making proper returns;

SB 1201 4
(13) On the part of any election judge, or party
watcher or challenger, furnishing any information tending in
any way to show the state of the count to any other person
prior to the closing of the polls;
(14) On the part of any voter, except as otherwise
provided by law, [allowing his or her ballot to be seen by
any person with the intent of letting it be known how he or
she is about to vote or has voted, or] knowingly making a
false statement as to his or her inability to mark a ballot;
(15) On the part of any election judge, disclosing to
any person the name of any candidate for whom a voter has
voted;
(16) Interfering, or attempting to interfere, with any
voter inside a polling place;
(17) On the part of any person at any registration
site, polling place, counting location or verification
location, causing any breach of the peace or engaging in
disorderly conduct, violence, or threats of violence whereby
such registration, election, count or verification is
impeded or interfered with;
100 (18) Exit polling, surveying, sampling,
101 electioneering, distributing election literature, posting
102 signs or placing vehicles bearing signs with respect to any
103 candidate or question to be voted on at an election on
104 election day inside the building in which a polling place is
105 located or within twenty-five feet of the building's outer
106 door closest to the polling place, or, on the part of any
107 person, refusing to remove or permit removal from property
108 owned or controlled by such person, any such election sign
109 or literature located within such distance on such day after
110 request for removal by any person;

SB 1201 5
111 (19) Stealing or willfully defacing, mutilating, or
112 destroying any campaign yard sign on private property,
113 except that this subdivision shall not be construed to
114 interfere with the right of any private property owner to
115 take any action with regard to campaign yard signs on the
116 owner's property and this subdivision shall not be construed
117 to interfere with the right of any candidate, or the
118 candidate's designee, to remove the candidate's campaign
119 yard sign from the owner's private property after the
120 election day.
✓